Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) As used in this section and section 2 of this 2024 Act:
(a) “Authorized service provider” means:
(A) A person that has an arrangement with an original equipment  manufacturer under
which:
(i) The original equipment manufacturer grants  a license to the person for the use of,
or otherwise permits the person to use, the  original equipment manufacturer’s trade name,
service mark or other proprietary identification for the purpose of offering the  services of
diagnosing, maintaining, repairing or updating consumer electronic equipment; or
(ii) The person  offers the services of diagnosing, maintaining, repairing or updating con-
sumer electronic equipment on behalf of the original equipment manufacturer or under the
original equipment manufacturer’s warranty; or
(B) An  original equipment manufacturer, but only in instances where the original equip-
ment manufacturer does  not have an arrangement described in subparagraph (A) of this
paragraph and offers the services of diagnosing, maintaining, repairing or updating consumer
electronic equipment that the original equipment manufacturer makes or sells.
(b) “Consumer electronic equipment” means a product that:
(A) Functions, in whole or in part, on the basis of digital  electronics that are embedded
within or attached to the product;
(B) Is tangible personal property;
(C) Is generally used for personal, family or household purposes;
Enrolled Senate Bill 1596 (SB 1596-A) Page 1
(D) Is sold, used  or supplied in this state one year or more after the product was first
manufactured and one  year or more after the product was first sold or used in this state;
and
(E) Might be, but is  not necessarily, capable of attachment to or installation in real
property.
(c) “Documentation” means any manual, diagram, reporting output,  service code de-
scription, schematic diagram, security code, password  or other guidance or information that
enables a person to diagnose, maintain, repair or update consumer electronic equipment.
(d) “Fair  and reasonable terms” means terms under which an original equipment man-
ufacturer:
(A) Makes documentation available at no charge, except that the original  equipment
manufacturer may  charge for the reasonable and actual costs of printing, preparing and
sending or preparing and sending documentation that a person requests in print;
(B) Makes tools for diagnosing, maintaining, repairing or updating consumer  electronic
equipment available at no charge and without impeding access to the tools or the efficient
and cost-effective use of the tools, except that the original equipment  manufacturer may
charge for the reasonable and actual costs of preparing  and shipping a physical tool that a
person requests; and
(C) Makes parts available directly or through an authorized service provider to:
(i) An independent repair provider or an owner at costs and on terms that  are equivalent
to the most favorable costs and terms at  which the original equipment manufacturer offers
the parts to an authorized service provider and that:
(I) Account for any discount, rebate,  convenient means of delivery, means of enabling
fully restored and updated functionality, rights of use or other incentive or preference  the
original equipment manufacturer offers to an authorized service provider, or that impose any
additional cost, burden or  impediment on an independent repair provider or an owner that
the original equipment manufacturer also imposes on an authorized service provider;
(II) Do not impose a  substantial condition, obligation or restriction that is not reasonably
necessary to enable an independent repair provider or an owner to diagnose, maintain, repair
or update consumer electronic equipment  that the original equipment manufacturer makes
or sells; and
(III) Do not require an independent repair  provider or an owner to enter into an ar-
rangement described in paragraph (a)(A) of this subsection; and
(ii) All authorized service providers that  the original equipment manufacturer permits,
by contract or otherwise, to sell parts to independent repair providers and owners, without:
(I) Imposing allocation limitations or advertising restrictions  upon the authorized service
provider as a means of retaliation or as a means  of hindering the authorized service provider
in selling parts by any means; or
(II) Imposing a substantial condition, obligation or restriction that is  not reasonably
necessary to enable an independent repair provider or an owner to diagnose, maintain, repair
or update consumer electronic equipment  that the original equipment manufacturer makes
or sells.
(e) “Independent repair provider” means a person that:
(A) Engages in the business of diagnosing, maintaining, repairing or updating consumer
electronic equipment in this state but is not an authorized service provider; and
(B) Possesses a  valid and unexpired certification that demonstrates that the person has
the technical capabilities and competence necessary  to safely, securely and reliably repair
consumer electronic equipment  in accordance with widely accepted standards, such as a
Wireless Industry Service Excellence  Certification, an A+ certification from the Computing
Technology Industry Association,  a National Appliance Service Technician Certification or
another certification  that an original equipment manufacturer accepts as evidence that the
Enrolled Senate Bill 1596 (SB 1596-A) Page 2
person can perform safe, secure and reliable repairs  to consumer electronic equipment that
the original equipment manufacturer makes or sells.
(f) “Original equipment  manufacturer” means a person that engages in the business of
selling, leasing or otherwise supplying to another person  new consumer electronic equipment
that the person makes or has made on the person’s behalf.
(g) “Owner”  means a person that owns or leases from a lessor consumer electronic
equipment that the person or the lessor purchased or used in this state.
(h) “Part” means a new or used replacement component for consumer electronic equip-
ment that an  original equipment manufacturer makes available for the purpose of main-
taining, repairing  or updating consumer electronic equipment that the original equipment
manufacturer makes or sells.
(i) “Parts pairing” means a manufacturer’s  practice of using software to identify com-
ponent parts through a unique identifier.
(j) “Tool” means software,  a hardware implement or an apparatus by means of which a
person can diagnose, maintain, repair or update consumer  electronic equipment including
any software, or a mechanism that provisions, programs or  pairs, a new part, calibrates
functionality or performs another function that is  necessary to update or restore a product
to a fully functional condition.
(k) “Trade secret” has the meaning given that term in ORS 646.461.
(L)(A) “Video game console” means  a computing device, and components and peripherals
for the computing device, that is intended primarily for playing interactive video games.
(B) “Video  game console” does not include a general purpose personal computer that has
the capability to run video games alongside other computing functions.
(2)(a) An original equipment manufacturer shall make available to an owner  or an inde-
pendent repair provider on fair and reasonable terms  any documentation, tool, part or other
device or implement that the original equipment manufacturer makes available to an  au-
thorized service provider for the purpose of  diagnosing, maintaining, repairing or updating
consumer electronic equipment that the original  equipment manufacturer makes or sells and
that is sold or used in this state.
(b) For consumer electronic equipment that is manufactured for the  first time, and first
sold or used  in this state, after January 1, 2025, an original equipment manufacturer may
not use parts pairing to:
(A) Prevent or  inhibit an independent repair provider or an owner from installing or en-
abling the function of an otherwise functional replacement part or a component of  consumer
electronic equipment, including a replacement part or a component  that the original equip-
ment manufacturer has not approved;
(B) Reduce the functionality or performance of consumer electronic equipment; or
(C) Cause consumer electronic equipment to display misleading alerts  or warnings, which
the owner cannot immediately dismiss, about unidentified parts.
(3) This section does not:
(a) Require an original equipment manufacturer to disclose a trade secret or  license in-
tellectual property, including copyrights or patents, to an  independent repair provider or an
owner except as necessary to provide, on fair and reasonable terms, any documentation, tool,
part or other device  or implement used to diagnose, maintain, repair or update consumer
electronic equipment.
(b) Alter the terms of any agreement  or arrangement between an original equipment
manufacturer and an authorized service provider including, but not limited to, the authorized
service provider’s performance or provision of warranty service  or recall repair work on the
original equipment manufacturer’s  behalf under the agreement or arrangement, except that
any provision in the agreement or arrangement that purports to waive, restrict or limit the
original equipment manufacturer’s compliance with this section is void and unenforceable.
Enrolled Senate Bill 1596 (SB 1596-A) Page 3
(c) Impose liability upon an original equipment manufacturer  for any bodily injury or
damage to consumer electronic equipment that an independent repair provider or an  owner
causes while diagnosing, maintaining, repairing or updating the consumer electronic equip-
ment using  documentation, tools, parts or other devices or implements that the original
equipment manufacturer made available on fair and reasonable terms to an authorized ser-
vice provider, an independent repair provider or  an owner before the date of the diagnosis,
maintenance, repair or update, except  that an original equipment manufacturer remains li-
able to the extent that the laws of this state provide for strict liability for defects  in the
design or manufacture of the consumer electronic equipment.
(d) Require an original equipment manufacturer to make available special documentation,
tools, parts or other devices or implements  that would disable or override, without an
owner’s authorization, anti-theft or privacy security measures that the owner sets for con-
sumer electronic equipment.
(e) Require an original equipment manufacturer to  provide to an independent repair
provider or an owner  any part that the equipment manufacturer no longer makes or no
longer provides to authorized service providers.
(f) Prohibit parts pairing for the purpose of reducing the functionality of a  battery if a
thermal event occurs.
(g) Apply to:
(A) A person that is engaged in the business of manufacturing or assembling  new motor
vehicles or in  the business of selling or leasing new motor vehicles and offering the service
of diagnosing, maintaining or repairing motor vehicles or motor  vehicle engines under the
terms of a franchise agreement, or to the person’s products or services;
(B) A product or service or equipment that:
(i) Has never been available for retail sale to a consumer;
(ii) Is a medical device, as defined in the Federal  Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act, 21 U.S.C.
301 et seq., or a digital electronic product, software, control equipment  or a related product
manufactured for or service provided for use in diagnosis  or monitoring in an acute care
hospital, a long term care facility such as a nursing home or skilled nursing facility, a
physician’s office, an urgent care center,  an outpatient clinic, a home setting where health
care is provided by or at the direction of a licensed  health care provider or an emergency
medical service facility or for use  in diagnosis or monitoring at a site where health care is
routinely delivered on premises that are not otherwise a health care facility, such as a
medical clinic within a school;
(iii) Provides heat, ventilation or air conditioning or recharges refrigerant gases;
(iv) Is a system, mechanism or series of mechanisms  that generates, stores or combines
generation and storage of electrical energy from solar radiation;
(v) Is a video game console; or
(vi) Is a system that stores electrical energy for a period of time and  transmits the en-
ergy after  storage, that is interconnected with a transmission or distribution system and
that is approved by an electric utility or located on a customer’s side of an electric  utility
meter in accordance with an applicable utility tariff or interconnection agreement;
(C) A vehicle, an engine, equipment or a power  source, or a person that engages directly
in, or acts for or is subject to the control of another person that engages directly in, man-
ufacturing, assembling, distributing, selling,  importing for resale, maintaining, servicing or
repairing a vehicle, an engine, equipment  or a power source with any of the following char-
acteristics:
(i) An  internal combustion engine, including the engine’s fuel system or other power
sources such as an electric battery or a fuel cell, that is  not used in a motor vehicle or in
a vehicle used solely for competition or that is not subject to standards of performance  for
stationary sources or  emission standards for new motor vehicles or new motor vehicle en-
gines under the federal Clean Air Act, 42 U.S.C. 7411 and 7521 et seq.;
Enrolled Senate Bill 1596 (SB 1596-A) Page 4
(ii) A vehicle or equipment that is not a motor vehicle or  a vehicle used solely for com-
petition and is powered by an engine described in sub-subparagraph (i)  of this subparagraph,
together with  any tools, technology, attachments, accessories, components or repair parts
for the vehicle, equipment or engine;
(iii) An  internal combustion engine or another power source, including an electric battery
or a fuel cell, that is not used in a motor vehicle, in a vehicle used  solely for competition or
in a vehicle or equipment described in sub-subparagraph (ii) of this subparagraph,  or equip-
ment that is powered by the internal combustion engine or other power source, together
with tools, technology, attachments, accessories, components or  repair parts for the internal
combustion engine, the other power source or the equipment; or
(iv) An engine or other  power source, including an electric battery or a fuel cell, that is
used for propulsion or power generation in  a maritime environment or a waterway, together
with any tools,  technology, attachments, accessories, components or repair parts for the
engine or the other power source;
(D) A manufacturer, distributor or dealer  of any off-road equipment or of tools, tech-
nology, attachments, accessories, components or repair parts for off-road equipment  includ-
ing, but not  limited to, farm and utility tractors, farm implements and machinery, equipment
for forestry, industry, utilities, construction,  mining or maintaining a yard, garden or turf,
outdoor power equipment and portable generators, vehicles used in marine environments, for
sports, recreation and racing, all-terrain vehicles, power tools and stand-alone or  integrated
mobile or stationary internal combustion  engines or power sources such as generator sets
and battery or fuel cell power; or
(E) Electric toothbrushes.
SECTION 2.
(1) As used in this section:
(a) “Certification entity” means a person that  engages in evaluating and certifying the
technical capabilities and competence  of independent repair providers in accordance with
standards that the person adopts or that an original equipment manufacturer specifies.
(b) “Repair certification” means evidence that an independent repair provider has  the
technical and financial capability and competence necessary to  safely, securely and reliably
repair digital electronic equipment in accordance with standards that a  certification entity
specifies.
(2) Before repairing consumer electronic equipment,  an authorized service provider and
an independent repair provider shall:
(a) Post at the authorized service provider’s or independent repair provider’s place of
business or on the authorized service provider’s or independent  repair provider’s website, or
provide directly to customers, a notice that:
(A) Specifies the steps the authorized  service provider or independent repair provider
takes to ensure the  customer’s privacy and the security of consumer electronic equipment
the customer entrusts to the authorized service provider or independent repair provider;
(B) Recommends steps  the consumer should take to ensure privacy and security, in-
cluding but not limited to:
(i) Backing up data from the consumer electronic equipment onto another device  and
permanently erasing the data from the  consumer electronic equipment the customer will
bring in for repair;
(ii) Sharing only those passwords or access to functions that are necessary to effect  the
repair; and
(iii) Logging out of applications, closing websites and deleting caches or  records of ap-
plication or website use that have sensitive information or that otherwise pose a  security
risk, such as financial applications or websites, electronic mail  or messaging or social media
accounts;
(C) Informs the customer about the customer’s rights to privacy under the  laws of this
state; and
Enrolled Senate Bill 1596 (SB 1596-A) Page 5
(D) Informs the  customer about any potential safety concerns about the parts being in-
stalled.
(b) Display all of the authorized service  provider’s or independent repair provider’s repair
certifications.
(3) Before  repairing consumer electronic equipment, an independent repair provider shall
disclose to each customer:
(a) That the independent repair provider is not an authorized service provider; and
(b) Whether replacement parts the independent repair  provider incorporates into repairs
are used replacement parts or are replacement parts  provided by suppliers other than the
original equipment manufacturer of the consumer electronic equipment.
SECTION 3.
(1) If the Attorney General determines  in response to a complaint from a
consumer that a person has or controls any information, documents, physical evidence or
other material that is relevant to an investigation of a violation of section 1 of this 2024 Act,
or that could lead to a discovery  of relevant information in an investigation of a violation
of section 1 of this 2024 Act, the  Attorney General may execute and cause an investigative
demand to be served upon the person. The investigative demand may require that the person:
(a) Appear and testify under oath at the time  and place stated in the investigative de-
mand;
(b) Answer written interrogatories; and
(c) Produce relevant information, documents, physical  evidence or other material for
examination at the time and place stated in the investigative demand.
(2) An investigative demand under this section must  be served as provided in ORS 646.622
and may be enforced as provided in ORS 646.626. Within the earlier of the  return date spec-
ified in the investigative demand or 20 days after the date on which  the investigative demand
was served, a person may petition a circuit court of this  state to extend the return date or
modify or set aside  the investigative demand. The petition must state good cause, including
any privileged material.
(3) Information  the Attorney General obtains under this section that is a trade secret,
as defined in ORS 192.345, is confidential  and is not subject to public disclosure under ORS
192.311 to 192.478.
(4) If  the Attorney General finds in response to a complaint from a consumer that a
person has violated section 1 of this 2024 Act, the Attorney General may bring  a civil action
in a circuit court of this state to:
(a) Impose a civil penalty of not more than $1,000 for each day  in which the violation
continues; or
(b) Obtain an injunction to restrain the violation.
(5) The Attorney General  shall deposit the proceeds of any civil penalties the Attorney
General recovers  under this section into the Department of Justice Protection and Education
Revolving Account created under ORS 180.095.
SECTION 4.
The Attorney General shall submit not later than December  31, 2025, a re-
port to an interim committee of the Legislative  Assembly concerned with consumer pro-
tection in which the Attorney General specifies the  number and nature of complaints from
owners and independent repair providers the Attorney General received  within the previous
two years concerning original  equipment manufacturers that did not provide upon request
documentation, tools, parts or other devices  or implements necessary to diagnose, maintain,
repair or update  consumer electronic equipment that the original equipment manufacturer
makes or sells.
SECTION 5.  ORS 180.095 is amended to read:
180.095. (1) The Department of Justice Protection and Education Revolving Account is created
in the General Fund. All moneys in the account are continuously appropriated  to the Department
of Justice and may be used to pay for only the following activities:
(a) Restitution and refunds in proceedings described in paragraph (c) of this subsection;
Enrolled Senate Bill 1596 (SB 1596-A) Page 6
(b) Consumer and business  education relating to the laws governing antitrust and unlawful trade
practices; and
(c) Personal services, travel, meals, lodging and all other costs and  expenses incurred by the
department in  investigating, preparing, commencing and prosecuting the following actions and suits,
and enforcing  judgments, settlements, compromises and assurances of voluntary compliance arising
out of the following actions and suits:
(A) Actions and suits under the state and federal antitrust laws;
(B) Actions and suits under ORS 336.184 and 646.605 to 646.656;
(C) Actions commenced under ORS 59.331;
(D) Actions and suits under ORS 180.750 to 180.785;
(E) Actions and suits under ORS 646A.025; [ and]
(F) Actions commenced under ORS 646A.589[ .]; and
(G) Actions and suits under section 3 of this 2024 Act.
(2) Moneys in the Department  of Justice Protection and Education Revolving Account are not
subject to allotment. Upon request of the Attorney General, the State Treasurer shall create sub-
accounts within the account for  the purposes of managing moneys in the account and allocating
those moneys to the activities described in subsection (1) of this section.
(3) Except as otherwise provided by law, all sums of money received by the Department of Jus-
tice  under  a judgment, settlement, compromise or assurance of voluntary compliance, including
damages, restitution, refunds, attorney fees, costs,  disbursements and other recoveries, but excluding
civil penalties under ORS 646.642, in proceedings described in subsection  (1)(c) of this section shall,
upon receipt,  be deposited with the State Treasurer to the credit of the Department of Justice Pro-
tection and Education Revolving Account. However, if the  action or suit was based on an expendi-
ture or loss from a public  body or a dedicated fund, the amount of such expenditure or loss, after
deduction of attorney fees and expenses awarded to the department by  the court or agreed to by the
parties, if any, shall be credited to the public body or dedicated fund  and the remainder thereof
credited to the Department of Justice Protection and Education Revolving Account.
(4) If the Department of Justice recovers restitution  or refunds in a proceeding described in
subsection (1)(c) of this section, and the department cannot  determine the persons to whom the
restitution or refunds should be paid or  the amount of the restitution or refund payable to individual
claimants is de minimis, the restitution or refunds may not be deposited in the Department of Justice
Protection and Education Revolving Account and shall be deposited in the General Fund.
(5) Before April 1 of each odd-numbered year, the Department of Justice shall report to the Joint
Committee on Ways and Means:
(a) The department’s  projection of the balance in the Department of Justice Protection and Ed-
ucation Revolving Account at the  end of the biennium in which the report is made and at the end
of the following biennium;
(b) The amount of the balance held for restitution and refunds;
(c) An estimate of  the department’s anticipated costs and expenses under subsection (1)(b) and
(c) of this section for the biennium in which the report is  made and for the following biennium; and
(d) Any judgment,  settlement, compromise or other recovery, the proceeds of which are used for
purposes other than:
(A) For deposit into the Department of Justice Protection and Education Revolving  Account;
or
(B) For payment of legal costs related to the  judgment, settlement, compromise or other recov-
ery.
(6) The Joint Committee on  Ways and Means, after consideration of recommendations made by
the Department of Justice, shall use the  information reported under subsection (5) of this section to
determine an appropriate balance for the revolving account.
SECTION 6.
(1) As used in this section, “cell phone” means a handheld  product that in-
cludes a battery, microphone, speaker and  display and that is designed to send and receive
transmissions through a cellular radiotelephone service.
Enrolled Senate Bill 1596 (SB 1596-A) Page 7
(2) Except as provided  in subsection (3) of this section, section 1 of this 2024 Act applies
to consumer electronic equipment that  is sold in this state or is in use in this state on or
after the effective date of this 2024 Act.
(3) Section 1 of this 2024 Act does not apply to:
(a) A cell phone that was manufactured for the first time, and first  sold or used in this
state, before July 1, 2021; or
(b) Consumer electronic equipment other than a cell  phone that was manufactured for
the first time, and first sold or used in this state, before July 1, 2015.
SECTION 7.
Section 3 of this 2024 Act applies to violations of section 1 of this 2024 Act
that occur on or after July 1, 2027.
Passed by Senate February 20, 2024
..................................................................................
Obadiah Rutledge, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Passed by House March 4, 2024
..................................................................................
Dan Rayfield, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2024
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2024
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2024
..................................................................................
LaVonne Griffin-Valade, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 1596 (SB 1596-A) Page 8